Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-1304
Power to levy taxes and issue bonds and notes.

Whenever the city exercises the power conferred in sections 15-1301 to 15-1307, it shall have the power to levy taxes for the exercise of such jurisdiction and authority, and it shall also have the power to issue general obligation bonds, general obligation notes, revenue bonds and revenue notes including general obligation and revenue refunding bonds and notes for a community development activity under the power granted to any authority described or as otherwise authorized by home rule charter or state law.

Laws 1974, LB 825, § 4.